Washington statutes.
RCW 43.166.020

Board of directors.

(1) The affairs of a state lands development authority shall be managed by a board of directors.

(2) The initial board of directors of a state lands development authority must be appointed by the governor upon recommendation from the state legislative delegation from the district in which the boundaries of the state lands development authority are contained.

(3) The number of persons on the board of directors must be included in the proposal to establish a state lands development authority under RCW 43.166.010.

(4) Members of the board of directors must include:

(a) At least one member representing each of the following:

(i) The governing body of each city included in the boundaries of the state lands development authority;

(ii) The mayor's office of each city included in the boundaries of the state lands development authority;

(iii) The governing body of each county included in the boundaries of the state lands development authority; and

(iv) The governing body of each port district included in the boundaries of the state lands development authority;

(b) Additional members if required by the proposal to establish a state lands development authority under RCW 43.166.010; and

(c) Ex officio, nonvoting members if required by the proposal to establish a state lands development authority under RCW 43.166.010.

(5) In addition to other applicable provisions of law pertaining to conflicts of interest of public officials, no state lands development authority board member, appointed or otherwise, may participate in any decision on any board contract in which the board member has any interests, direct or indirect, with any firm, partnership, corporation, or association that would be the recipient of any gain or benefit resulting from transactions with the state lands development authority. In any instance where the participation occurs, the board shall void the transaction, and the involved member shall be subject to whatever sanctions may be provided by law. The board shall frame and adopt a code of ethics for its members, which must be designed to protect the state and its citizens from any unethical conduct by the board.

[ 2022 c 259 s 2.]